Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/mn_affix.dat
SFX g Y 132
SFX g 0 доо .
SFX g 0 дог .
SFX g 0 дон .
SFX g 0 дооч .
SFX g 0 доосой .
SFX g 0 доорой .
SFX g 0 доод .
SFX g 0 доогүй .
SFX g 0 донгуут .
SFX g 0 донгоо .
SFX g 0 дож .
SFX g 0 довч .
SFX g 0 дов .
SFX g 0 дохынхоо .
SFX g 0 дохынх .
SFX g 0 дохын .
SFX g 0 дохыгоо .
SFX g 0 дохыг .
SFX g 0 дохтой .
SFX g 0 дохоосоо .
SFX g 0 дохоос .
SFX g 0 дохоороо .
SFX g 0 дохоор .
SFX g 0 дохоо .
SFX g 0 доход .
SFX g 0 дохлоор .
SFX g 0 дохдоо .
SFX g 0 дохгүй .
SFX g 0 дох .
SFX g 0 донгуутаа .
SFX g 0 догчтой .
SFX g 0 догчоос .
SFX g 0 догчоор .
SFX g 0 догчоо .
SFX g 0 догчийнх .
SFX g 0 догчийн .
SFX g 0 догчийг .
SFX g 0 догчид .
SFX g 0 догчдынх .
SFX g 0 догчдын .
SFX g 0 догчдыг .
SFX g 0 догчдоос .
SFX g 0 догчдоор .
SFX g 0 догчдоо .
SFX g 0 догчдод .
SFX g 0 догчгүй .
SFX g 0 догч .
SFX g 0 дохтойгоо .
SFX g 0 дохлоороо .
SFX g 0 догчтойгоо .
SFX g 0 догчоосоо .
SFX g 0 догчоороо .
SFX g 0 догчийнхоо .
SFX g 0 догчийгоо .
SFX g 0 догчидтой .
SFX g 0 догчидгүй .
SFX g 0 догчдынхоо .
SFX g 0 догчдыгоо .
SFX g 0 догчдоосоо .
SFX g 0 догчдоороо .
SFX g 0 догчдодоо .
SFX g 0 дсоор .
SFX g 0 дсондоо .
SFX g 0 дсонд .
SFX g 0 дсон .
SFX g 0 догчидтойгоо .
SFX g 0 дмооргүй .
SFX g 0 дмоор .
SFX g 0 дмогцоо .
SFX g 0 дмогц .
SFX g 0 длоо .
SFX g 0 ддогтоо .
SFX g 0 ддогтой .
SFX g 0 ддогт .
SFX g 0 ддогоос .
SFX g 0 ддогоор .
SFX g 0 ддогоо .
SFX g 0 ддогийнх .
SFX g 0 ддогийн .
SFX g 0 ддогийг .
SFX g 0 ддоггүй .
SFX g 0 ддог .
SFX g 0 двол .
SFX g 0 дъё .
SFX g 0 дтолоо .
SFX g 0 дтол .
SFX g 0 дсоныхоо .
SFX g 0 дсоных .
SFX g 0 дсоныгоо .
SFX g 0 дсоныг .
SFX g 0 дсоны .
SFX g 0 дсонтой .
SFX g 0 дсоноос .
SFX g 0 дсоноор .
SFX g 0 дсоноо .
SFX g 0 дсонгүй .
SFX g 0 ддогтойгоо .
SFX g 0 ддогоосоо .
SFX g 0 ддогоороо .
SFX g 0 ддогийнхоо .
SFX g 0 ддогийгоо .
SFX g 0 дсонтойгоо .
SFX g 0 дсоноосоо .
SFX g 0 дсоноороо .
SFX g 0 дохгүйн .
SFX g 0 доогүйн .
SFX g 0 доогүйд .
SFX g 0 доогүйг .
SFX g 0 дохгүйд .
SFX g 0 дохгүйг .
SFX g 0 доогүйтэй .
SFX g 0 доогүйгээс .
SFX g 0 доогүйгээр .
SFX g 0 доогүйгээ .
SFX g 0 дохгүйтэй .
SFX g 0 дохгүйгээс .
SFX g 0 дохгүйгээр .
SFX g 0 дохгүйгээ .
SFX g 0 ддоггүйн .
SFX g 0 ддоггүйд .
SFX g 0 ддоггүйг .
SFX g 0 дсонгүйн .
SFX g 0 дсонгүйд .
SFX g 0 дсонгүйг .
SFX g 0 ддоггүйгээс .
SFX g 0 ддоггүйгээр .
SFX g 0 ддоггүйгээ .
SFX g 0 дсонгүйтэй .
SFX g 0 дсонгүйгээс .
SFX g 0 дсонгүйгээр .
SFX g 0 дсонгүйгээ .
SFX g 0 доно .
SFX h Y 8
SFX h 0 снээсээ .
SFX h 0 снийхээ .
SFX h 0 дгээсээ .
SFX h 0 дгээрээ .
SFX h 0 дгийгээ .
SFX h 0 дгийнхээ .
SFX h 0 снээрээ .
SFX h 0 снийгээ .
SFX i Y 16
SFX i 0 на .
SFX i 0 гчдаар .
SFX i 0 гчийгаа .
SFX i 0 гчидтай .
SFX i 0 гчдыгаа .
SFX i 0 гчдадаа .
SFX i 0 гчаасаа .
SFX i 0 гчаараа .
SFX i 0 хлаар .
SFX i 0 гчтайгаа .
SFX i 0 гчийнхаа .
SFX i 0 гчдынхаа .
SFX i 0 гчдаасаа .
SFX i 0 гчдаараа .
SFX i 0 гчидтайгаа .
SFX i 0 хлаараа .
SFX j Y 29
SFX j 0 хоо .
SFX j 0 сны .
SFX j 0 сных .
SFX j 0 сныг .
SFX j 0 сон .
SFX j 0 хыг .
SFX j 0 хын .
SFX j 0 хынх .
SFX j 0 дог .
SFX j 0 лоо .
SFX j 0 догт .
SFX j 0 моор .
SFX j 0 могц .
SFX j 0 сонд .
SFX j 0 вол .
SFX j 0 но .
SFX j 0 соор .
SFX j 0 тол .
SFX j 0 тлоо .
SFX j 0 дгоо .
SFX j 0 сноо .
SFX j 0 хоос .
SFX j 0 хоор .
SFX j 0 ход .
SFX j 0 хтой .
SFX j 0 ё .
SFX j 0 гчоо .
SFX j 0 нгоо .
SFX j 0 хдоо .
SFX k Y 27
SFX k 0 сны .
SFX k 0 сных .
SFX k 0 сныг .
SFX k 0 сон .
SFX k 0 сонд .
SFX k 0 сондоо .
SFX k 0 сонтой .
SFX k 0 сонгүй .
SFX k 0 сонтойгоо .
SFX k 0 сонгүйн .
SFX k 0 сонгүйд .
SFX k 0 сонгүйг .
SFX k 0 сонгүйгээ .
SFX k 0 сонгүйтэй .
SFX k 0 сонгүйгээс .
SFX k 0 сонгүйгээр .
SFX k 0 сонсон .
SFX k 0 соор .
SFX k 0 тол .
SFX k 0 тлоо .
SFX k 0 сноос .
SFX k 0 сныхоо .
SFX k 0 сноо .
SFX k 0 сноосоо .
SFX k 0 сноор .
SFX k 0 сныгоо .
SFX k 0 сноороо .
SFX l Y 6
SFX l 0 дгийгаа .
SFX l 0 дгаасаа .
SFX l 0 дгаараа .
SFX l 0 снаасаа .
SFX l 0 дгийнхаа .
SFX l 0 снаараа .
SFX m Y 10
SFX m 0 ээд .
SFX m 0 ээч .
SFX m 0 ээгүй .
SFX m 0 ээсэй .
SFX m 0 ээрэй .
SFX m 0 эн .
SFX m 0 эв .
SFX m 0 эвч .
SFX m 0 энгээ .
SFX m 0 энгүүт .
SFX n Y 6
SFX n 0 мааргүй .
SFX n 0 дагтайгаа .
SFX n 0 дгийн .
SFX n 0 дгийг .
SFX n 0 сантайгаа .
SFX n 0 дгийнх .
SFX o Y 5
SFX o 0 г .
SFX o 0 х .
SFX o 0 н .
SFX o 0 жээ .
SFX o 0 ж .
SFX p Y 24
SFX p 0 эх .
SFX p 0 эгч .
SFX p 0 эхээ .
SFX p 0 эхэд .
SFX p 0 эхээс .
SFX p 0 эхээр .
SFX p 0 эхтэй .
SFX p 0 эхийн .
SFX p 0 эхийг .
SFX p 0 эхдээ .
SFX p 0 эхгүй .
SFX p 0 эгчээ .
SFX p 0 эгчид .
SFX p 0 эхийнх .
SFX p 0 эгчээс .
SFX p 0 эгчээр .
SFX p 0 эгчтэй .
SFX p 0 эгчийн .
SFX p 0 эгчийг .
SFX p 0 эгчдээ .
SFX p 0 эгчдэд .
SFX p 0 эгчгүй .
SFX p 0 эхлээр .
SFX p 0 энэ .
SFX q Y 7
SFX q 0 дэггүйн .
SFX q 0 дэггүйд .
SFX q 0 дэггүйг .
SFX q 0 сэнгүйн .
SFX q 0 сэнгүйд .
SFX q 0 сэнгүйг .
SFX q 0 тлээ .
SFX r Y 15
SFX r 0 сэн .
SFX r 0 дгийнх .
SFX r 0 ье .
SFX r 0 нэ .
SFX r 0 сний .
SFX r 0 снийх .
SFX r 0 снийг .
SFX r 0 тлээ .
SFX r 0 дгээ .
SFX r 0 снээс .
SFX r 0 снээ .
SFX r 0 дгээс .
SFX r 0 дгээр .
SFX r 0 снээр .
SFX r 0 бэл .
SFX s Y 133
SFX s 0 дгийнх .
SFX s 0 ье .
SFX s 0 сний .
SFX s 0 снийх .
SFX s 0 снийг .
SFX s 0 сөн .
SFX s 0 чихье .
SFX s 0 чихтэй .
SFX s 0 чхийн .
SFX s 0 чхийг .
SFX s 0 чхийнх .
SFX s 0 дөг .
SFX s 0 лөө .
SFX s 0 дөгт .
SFX s 0 дөгтэй .
SFX s 0 дөгтөө .
SFX s 0 дөггүй .
SFX s 0 дөгтэйгөө .
SFX s 0 мөөр .
SFX s 0 мөгц .
SFX s 0 мөгцөө .
SFX s 0 мөөргүй .
SFX s 0 дөггүйг .
SFX s 0 дөггүйн .
SFX s 0 дөггүйд .
SFX s 0 сөнд .
SFX s 0 дөггүйгээ .
SFX s 0 дөггүйгээс .
SFX s 0 дөггүйгээр .
SFX s 0 дөггүйтэй .
SFX s 0 сөндөө .
SFX s 0 сөнтэй .
SFX s 0 сөнгүй .
SFX s 0 сөнтэйгөө .
SFX s 0 сөнгүйн .
SFX s 0 сөнгүйд .
SFX s 0 сөнгүйг .
SFX s 0 сөнгүйгээ .
SFX s 0 сөнгүйгээс .
SFX s 0 сөнгүйгээр .
SFX s 0 сөнгүйтэй .
SFX s 0 нө .
SFX s 0 төл .
SFX s 0 сөөр .
SFX s 0 дгөө .
SFX s 0 дгөөс .
SFX s 0 дгөөр .
SFX s 0 дгөөсөө .
SFX s 0 дгөөрөө .
SFX s 0 дгийгөө .
SFX s 0 дгийнхөө .
SFX s 0 тлөө .
SFX s 0 снөөс .
SFX s 0 снөө .
SFX s 0 снөөсөө .
SFX s 0 снөөр .
SFX s 0 снийхөө .
SFX s 0 снөөрөө .
SFX s 0 снийгөө .
SFX s 0 чихсөн .
SFX s 0 чихнө .
SFX s 0 чихлөө .
SFX s 0 чихдөг .
SFX s 0 чихвөл .
SFX s 0 чихдөө .
SFX s 0 чихсөнтэй .
SFX s 0 чихсөнөөсөө .
SFX s 0 чихсөнөөс .
SFX s 0 чихсөнөөрөө .
SFX s 0 чихсөнөөр .
SFX s 0 чихсөнөө .
SFX s 0 чихсөнийхөө .
SFX s 0 чихсөнийх .
SFX s 0 чихсөнийгөө .
SFX s 0 чихсөнийг .
SFX s 0 чихсөний .
SFX s 0 чихсөндөө .
SFX s 0 чихсөнд .
SFX s 0 чихсөнгүйн .
SFX s 0 чихсөнгүйд .
SFX s 0 чихсөнгүйг .
SFX s 0 чихсөнгүй .
SFX s 0 чихмөөргүй .
SFX s 0 чихмөөр .
SFX s 0 чихмөгцөө .
SFX s 0 чихмөгц .
SFX s 0 чихдөгтэй .
SFX s 0 чихдөгтөө .
SFX s 0 чихдөгт .
SFX s 0 чихдөгөөсөө .
SFX s 0 чихдөгөөс .
SFX s 0 чихдөгөөрөө .
SFX s 0 чихдөгөөр .
SFX s 0 чихдөгөө .
SFX s 0 чихдөгийнх .
SFX s 0 чихдөгийн .
SFX s 0 чихдөгийгөө .
SFX s 0 чихдөгийг .
SFX s 0 чихдөггүйн .
SFX s 0 чихдөггүйд .
SFX s 0 чихдөггүйг .
SFX s 0 чихдөггүй .
SFX s 0 чихтэйгөө .
SFX s 0 чихлөөрөө .
SFX s 0 чихлөөр .
SFX s 0 чхөө .
SFX s 0 чхөн .
SFX s 0 чхөж .
SFX s 0 чхөд .
SFX s 0 чхөг .
SFX s 0 чхөв .
SFX s 0 чхөөч .
SFX s 0 чхөөс .
SFX s 0 чхөөр .
SFX s 0 чхөөд .
SFX s 0 чхөвч .
SFX s 0 чхөөсэй .
SFX s 0 чхөөсөө .
SFX s 0 чхөөрэй .
SFX s 0 чхөөрөө .
SFX s 0 чхөөгүйтэй .
SFX s 0 чхөөгүйн .
SFX s 0 чхөөгүйд .
SFX s 0 чхөөгүйгээс .
SFX s 0 чхөөгүйгээр .
SFX s 0 чхөөгүйгээ .
SFX s 0 чхөөгүйг .
SFX s 0 чхөөгүй .
SFX s 0 чхөнгүүтээ .
SFX s 0 чхөнгүүт .
SFX s 0 чхөнгөө .
SFX s 0 чхийнхөө .
SFX s 0 чхийгөө .
SFX t Y 23
SFX t 0 чтэй .
SFX t 0 чдийн .
SFX t 0 чдийг .
SFX t 0 чидтэй .
SFX t 0 чдийнх .
SFX t 0 чээ .
SFX t 0 чдээ .
SFX t 0 чээр .
SFX t 0 чээс .
SFX t 0 чдэд .
SFX t 0 чдээс .
SFX t 0 чдээр .
SFX t 0 чийгээ .
SFX t 0 чдэдээ .
SFX t 0 чээсээ .
SFX t 0 чээрээ .
SFX t 0 чийнхээ .
SFX t 0 чдээсээ .
SFX t 0 чдээрээ .
SFX t 0 чдийгээ .
SFX t 0 чтэйгээ .
SFX t 0 чдийнхээ .
SFX t 0 чидтэйгээ .
SFX u Y 83
SFX u 0 гдталаа .
SFX u 0 гдтал .
SFX u 0 гдсаныхаа .
SFX u 0 гдсаных .
SFX u 0 гдсаныгаа .
SFX u 0 гдсаныг .
SFX u 0 гдсаны .
SFX u 0 гдсантай .
SFX u 0 гдсандаа .
SFX u 0 гдсанд .
SFX u 0 гдсангүй .
SFX u 0 гдсанаасаа .
SFX u 0 гдсанаас .
SFX u 0 гдсанаараа .
SFX u 0 гдсанаар .
SFX u 0 гдсанаа .
SFX u 0 гдсан .
SFX u 0 гдсаар .
SFX u 0 гдмагцаа .
SFX u 0 гдмагц .
SFX u 0 гдмааргүй .
SFX u 0 гдмаар .
SFX u 0 гдлаа .
SFX u 0 гддагтай .
SFX u 0 гддагтаа .
SFX u 0 гддагт .
SFX u 0 гддагийнх .
SFX u 0 гддагийн .
SFX u 0 гддагийгаа .
SFX u 0 гддагийг .
SFX u 0 гддаггүй .
SFX u 0 гддагаасаа .
SFX u 0 гддагаас .
SFX u 0 гддагаараа .
SFX u 0 гддагаар .
SFX u 0 гддагаа .
SFX u 0 гддаг .
SFX u 0 гдвал .
SFX u 0 гдахынхаа .
SFX u 0 гдахынх .
SFX u 0 гдахын .
SFX u 0 гдахыгаа .
SFX u 0 гдахыг .
SFX u 0 гдахтайгаа .
SFX u 0 гдахтай .
SFX u 0 гдахлаараа .
SFX u 0 гдахлаар .
SFX u 0 гдахдаа .
SFX u 0 гдахгүй .
SFX u 0 гдахад .
SFX u 0 гдахаасаа .
SFX u 0 гдахаас .
SFX u 0 гдахаараа .
SFX u 0 гдахаар .
SFX u 0 гдахаа .
SFX u 0 гдах .
SFX u 0 гдангуутаа .
SFX u 0 гдангуут .
SFX u 0 гдангаа .
SFX u 0 гдана .
SFX u 0 гдан .
SFX u 0 гдаж .
SFX u 0 гдавч .
SFX u 0 гдав .
SFX u 0 гдаач .
SFX u 0 гдаасай .
SFX u 0 гдаарай .
SFX u 0 гдаад .
SFX u 0 гдаагүй .
SFX u 0 гдаа .
SFX u 0 гдсантайгаа .
SFX u 0 гддагтайгаа .
SFX u 0 гддагийнхаа .
SFX u 0 гдагчтай .
SFX u 0 гдагчийнх .
SFX u 0 гдагчийн .
SFX u 0 гдагчийгаа .
SFX u 0 гдагчийг .
SFX u 0 гдагчидтай .
SFX u 0 гдагчидгүй .
SFX u 0 гдагчид .
SFX u 0 гдагчдынх .
SFX u 0 гдагчдын .
SFX v Y 12
SFX v 0 ье .
SFX v 0 дэгээ .
SFX v 0 сэнээ .
SFX v 0 сэний .
SFX v 0 дэгээс .
SFX v 0 дэгээр .
SFX v 0 дэгийн .
SFX v 0 дэгийг .
SFX v 0 сэнээс .
SFX v 0 сэнээр .
SFX v 0 сэнийх .
SFX v 0 сэнийг .
SFX w Y 41
SFX w 0 он .
SFX w 0 ог .
SFX w 0 ов .
SFX w 0 овч .
SFX w 0 онгоо .
SFX w 0 онгуут .
SFX w 0 ож .
SFX w 0 ох .
SFX w 0 охынхоо .
SFX w 0 охынх .
SFX w 0 охын .
SFX w 0 охыгоо .
SFX w 0 охыг .
SFX w 0 охтой .
SFX w 0 охоосоо .
SFX w 0 охоос .
SFX w 0 охоороо .
SFX w 0 охоор .
SFX w 0 охоо .
SFX w 0 оход .
SFX w 0 охдоо .
SFX w 0 охгүй .
SFX w 0 огчтой .
SFX w 0 огчоос .
SFX w 0 огчоор .
SFX w 0 огчоо .
SFX w 0 огчийнх .
SFX w 0 огчийн .
SFX w 0 огчийг .
SFX w 0 огчид .
SFX w 0 огчдынх .
SFX w 0 огчдын .
SFX w 0 огчдыг .
SFX w 0 огчдоос .
SFX w 0 огчдоор .
SFX w 0 огчдоо .
SFX w 0 огчдод .
SFX w 0 огчгүй .
SFX w 0 огч .
SFX w 0 охлоор .
SFX w 0 оно .
SFX x Y 31
SFX x 0 чхын .
SFX x 0 чхыг .
SFX x 0 чхынх .
SFX x 0 чхоо .
SFX x 0 чхон .
SFX x 0 чхож .
SFX x 0 чход .
SFX x 0 чхог .
SFX x 0 чхов .
SFX x 0 чхооч .
SFX x 0 чхоос .
SFX x 0 чхоор .
SFX x 0 чхоод .
SFX x 0 чховч .
SFX x 0 чхыгоо .
SFX x 0 чхынхоо .
SFX x 0 чхоосоо .
SFX x 0 чхоосой .
SFX x 0 чхоороо .
SFX x 0 чхоорой .
SFX x 0 чхоогүй .
SFX x 0 чхонгоо .
SFX x 0 чхонгуут .
SFX x 0 чхоогүйн .
SFX x 0 чхоогүйд .
SFX x 0 чхоогүйг .
SFX x 0 чхонгуутаа .
SFX x 0 чхоогүйтэй .
SFX x 0 чхоогүйгээс .
SFX x 0 чхоогүйгээр .
SFX x 0 чхоогүйгээ .
SFX y Y 30
SFX y 0 оо .
SFX y 0 жээ .
SFX y 0 доггүйн .
SFX y 0 доггүйд .
SFX y 0 доггүйг .
SFX y 0 доггүйгээ .
SFX y 0 доггүйгээс .
SFX y 0 доггүйгээр .
SFX y 0 сонгүйн .
SFX y 0 сонгүйд .
SFX y 0 сонгүйг .
SFX y 0 сонгүйгээ .
SFX y 0 сонгүйтэй .
SFX y 0 сонгүйгээс .
SFX y 0 сонгүйгээр .
SFX y 0 ъё .
SFX y 0 соор .
SFX y 0 тол .
SFX y 0 ооч .
SFX y 0 оод .
SFX y 0 оогүй .
SFX y 0 оосой .
SFX y 0 оорой .
SFX y 0 оогүйг .
SFX y 0 оогүйн .
SFX y 0 оогүйд .
SFX y 0 оогүйгээ .
SFX y 0 оогүйтэй .
SFX y 0 оогүйгээс .
SFX y 0 оогүйгээр .
SFX z Y 18
SFX z 0 ны .
SFX z 0 ных .
SFX z 0 нууд .
SFX z 0 нуудын .
SFX z 0 нуудыг .
SFX z 0 нуудад .
SFX z 0 нуудаа .
SFX z 0 нуудынх .
SFX z 0 нуудтай .
SFX z 0 нууддаа .
SFX z 0 нуудгүй .
SFX z 0 нуудаас .
SFX z 0 нуудаар .
SFX z 0 нуудыгаа .
SFX z 0 нуудынхаа .
SFX z 0 нуудаасаа .
SFX z 0 нуудаараа .
SFX z 0 нуудтайгаа .

REP 2
REP ий ы
REP ы ий
